src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_UD_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - díigud - ENGLISH : # CLASS_UD_STEM_1

     díigud+V+Sg+Impv: díigud
     díigud+V+Interr+Simp+Pres: díigud
     díigud+V+Interr+Past: díigudaa
     díigud+V+Indir+Past: díigudaan
     díigud+V+Rel: díiguds
     díigud+V+Rel+Evid: díigudaas
     díigud+V+Past+NonFact: díigudaa.ang
     díigud+V+Interr+Fut+Long: díigudäsaa
     díigud+V+Interr+Fut+Short: díigudäs
     díigud+V+Simp+Fut: díigudäsaang
     díigud+V+Imm+Fut: díigudäsga
     díigud+V+Rel+Fut: díigudäsaas
     díigud+V+Fut+NonFact: díigudäsaa.ang
     díigud+V+Bias+Imm+Pres: díigudʼuuj
     díigud+V+Bias+Simp+Pres: díigudʼuujang
     díigud+V+Res: díigudäsaaʼuujang
     díigud+V+Bias+Interr+Pres: díigudʼus
     díigud+V+Bias+Interr+Past: díigudʼujaa
     díigud+V+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: díigudʼuujaangaa
     díigud+V+Bias+Interr+Fut: díigudäsaaʼus
     díigud+V+Cert+Fut: díigudäsaaʼahlans
     díigud+V+Fut+Rflx+Interr: díigudäseehl
     díigud+V+Pl+Impv: díigudʼuu
     díigud+V+3pl+Imm+Pres: díigudʼwaa
     díigud+V+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: díigudʼwaa
     díigud+V+3pl+Simp+Pres: díigudʼwaang
     díigud+V+3pl+Dir+Past: díigudʼwägan
     díigud+V+3pl+Interr+Past: díigudʼaawaa
     díigud+V+3pl+Indir+Past: díigudʼaawaan
     díigud+V+3pl+Rel: díigudʼwaas
     díigud+V+3pl+Rel+Evid: díigudʼaawaas
     díigud+V+3pl+NonFact: díigudʼwaa.ang
     díigud+V+3pl+Past+NonFact: díigudʼaawaa.ang
     díigud+V+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: díigudʼwägiinii
     díigud+V+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: díigudʼwägaangaa
     díigud+V+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: díigudʼwägaangaan
     díigud+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: díigudʼwaaäsaa
     díigud+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: díigudʼwaaäs
     díigud+V+3pl+Simp+Fut: díigudʼwaaäsaang
     díigud+V+3pl+Imm+Fut: díigudʼwaaäsga
     díigud+V+3pl+Rel+Fut: díigudʼwaaäsaas
     díigud+V+3pl+Fut+NonFact: díigudʼwaaäsaa.ang
     díigud+V+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: díigudʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáa
     díigud+V+3pl+Near+Fut: díigudʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáang
     díigud+V+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: díigudʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     díigud+V+3pl+VNear+Fut: díigudʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     díigud+V+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: díigudʼwaaʼuuj
     díigud+V+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: díigudʼwaaʼuujang
     díigud+V+3pl+Res: díigudʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     díigud+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: díigudʼwaaʼus
     díigud+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: díigudʼwaaʼujaa
     díigud+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: díigudʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     díigud+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: díigudʼwaaäsaaʼus
     díigud+V+3pl+Cert+Pres: díigudʼwaaʼahlanggang
     díigud+V+3pl+Cert+Past: díigudʼwaaʼahlanggan
     díigud+V+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: díigudʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     díigud+V+3pl+Cert+Fut: díigudʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     díigud+V+3pl+Cert+Rel: díigudʼwaaʼahlans
     díigud+V+3pl+Ints+Past: díigudʼaawaaʼahlang
     díigud+V+3pl+Cont: díigudʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     díigud+V+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: díigudʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     díigud+V+3pl+Rflx: díigudʼwaaʼahl
     díigud+V+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: díigudʼwaaäseehl
     díigud+V+Neg+Sg+Impv: díigudʼang
     díigud+V+Neg+Imm+Pres: díigudʼangga
     díigud+V+Neg+Interr+Simp+Pres: díigudʼang
     díigud+V+Neg+Simp+Pres: díigudʼanggang
     díigud+V+Neg+Dir+Past: díigudʼanggan
     díigud+V+Neg+Interr+Past: díigudʼaangaa
     díigud+V+Neg+Indir+Past: díigudʼaangaan
     díigud+V+Neg+Rel: díigudʼans
     díigud+V+Neg+Rel+Evid: díigudʼaangaas
     díigud+V+Neg+NonFact: díigudʼangang
     díigud+V+Neg+Past+NonFact: díigudʼaangaa.ang
     díigud+V+Neg+Interr+Pres+Hab: díigudʼanggang
     díigud+V+Neg+Dir+Past+Hab: díigudʼanggiinii
     díigud+V+Neg+Interr+Past+Hab: díigudʼanggaangaa
     díigud+V+Neg+Indir+Past+Hab: díigudʼanggaangaan
     díigud+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Long: díigudʼangäsaa
     díigud+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Short: díigudʼangäs
     díigud+V+Neg+Simp+Fut: díigudʼangäsaang
     díigud+V+Neg+Imm+Fut: díigudʼangäsga
     díigud+V+Neg+Rel+Fut: díigudʼangäsaas
     díigud+V+Neg+Fut+NonFact: díigudʼangäsaa.ang
     díigud+V+Neg+Bias+Imm+Pres: díigudʼangʼuuj
     díigud+V+Neg+Bias+Simp+Pres: díigudʼangʼuujang
     díigud+V+Neg+Res: díigudʼangäsaaʼuujang
     díigud+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Pres: díigudʼangʼus
     díigud+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past: díigudʼangʼujaa
     díigud+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: díigudʼangʼuujaangaa
     díigud+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Fut: díigudʼangäsaaʼus
     díigud+V+Neg+Cert+Pres: díigudʼaangʼahlanggang
     díigud+V+Neg+Cert+Past: díigudʼaangʼahlanggan
     díigud+V+Neg+Cert+Past+Hab: díigudʼaangʼahlanggiinii
     díigud+V+Neg+Cert+Fut: díigudʼangäsaaʼahlans
     díigud+V+Neg+Cert+Rel: díigudʼaangʼahlans
     díigud+V+Neg+Ints+Past: díigudʼaangaaʼahlang
     díigud+V+Neg+Cont: díigudʼaangaaʼahlanggaa
     díigud+V+Neg+Ctfact+Pres: díigudʼaangaaʼahlanggang
     díigud+V+Neg+Rflx: díigudʼaangʼahl
     díigud+V+Neg+Fut+Rflx+Interr: díigudʼangäseehl
     díigud+V+Neg+Pl+Impv: díigudʼangʼuu
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Pres: díigudʼangʼwaa
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: díigudʼangʼwaa
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Pres: díigudʼangʼwaang
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past: díigudʼangʼwägan
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past: díigudʼangʼaawaa
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past: díigudʼangʼaawaan
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Rel: díigudʼangʼwaas
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Evid: díigudʼangʼaawaas
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+NonFact: díigudʼangʼwaa.ang
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Past+NonFact: díigudʼangʼaawaa.ang
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: díigudʼangʼwägiinii
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: díigudʼangʼwägaangaa
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: díigudʼangʼwägaangaan
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: díigudʼangʼwaaäsaa
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: díigudʼangʼwaaäs
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Fut: díigudʼangʼwaaäsaang
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Fut: díigudʼangʼwaaäsga
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Fut: díigudʼangʼwaaäsaas
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+NonFact: díigudʼangʼwaaäsaa.ang
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: díigudʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼáng
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Near+Fut: díigudʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼánggang
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: díigudʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+VNear+Fut: díigudʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: díigudʼangʼwaaʼuuj
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: díigudʼangʼwaaʼuujang
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Res: díigudʼangʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: díigudʼangʼwaaʼus
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: díigudʼangʼwaaʼujaa
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: díigudʼangʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: díigudʼangʼwaaäsaaʼus
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Pres: díigudʼangʼwaaʼahlanggang
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past: díigudʼangʼwaaʼahlanggan
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: díigudʼangʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Fut: díigudʼangʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Rel: díigudʼangʼwaaʼahlans
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Ints+Past: díigudʼangʼaawaaʼahlang
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Cont: díigudʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: díigudʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Rflx: díigudʼangʼwaaʼahl
     díigud+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: díigudʼangʼwaaäseehl
